Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2614
Optometrist;
therapeutic pharmaceutical agents; certification of courses of instruction;
board approval.

(1) An optometrist licensed in
this state may use topical ocular pharmaceutical agents for therapeutic purposes
authorized under subdivision (1)(b) or (c) of section 38-2605 if such person
is certified by the department, with the recommendation of the board, as qualified
to use ocular pharmaceutical agents for therapeutic purposes, including the
treatment of glaucoma.

(2) In
order to be certified by the department under subsection (1) of this section,
the optometrist shall show (a) satisfactory completion of classroom
education and clinical training which emphasizes the examination, diagnosis,
and treatment of the eye, ocular adnexa, and visual system offered by a school
or college approved by the board and passage of an examination approved by
the board or (b) evidence of certification in another state for the use
of therapeutic pharmaceutical agents which is deemed by the board as satisfactory
validation of such qualifications.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 74;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 886;

Laws 2014, LB526, § 3.